Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services,
for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $26,061,385
for debt service on outstanding general obligation bonds sold pursuant to Article XI-G of the
Oregon Constitution for the benefit of Oregon Health and Science University.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$30,906,415 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services from the Oregon
Health and Science University Bond Fund for the following purposes:
(1) Paying the principal of, and interest and premium  on, outstanding general obligation
bonds issued pursuant to Article XI-L of the Oregon Constitution;
(2) Funding the general obligation bond reserves; and
(3) Paying amounts due in connection with any instrument  authorized by section 18
(4)(c), chapter 921, Oregon Laws 2001.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$7,922,028 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services for debt service
on outstanding  general obligation bonds issued pursuant to Article XI-F (1) of the Oregon
Constitution for the benefit of Oregon Health and  Science University and paid with resources
received from Oregon Health and Science University and interest earned on the bonds.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5533 (SB 5533-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5533 (SB 5533-INTRO) Page 2